Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 77.
[SPECIAL JUDGES] (ARK. CONST., ART 7, §§ 9, 21, 22, REPEALED).

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by S.J.R. 2 during the 1997 Regular Session and adopted at the November 1998 general election by a vote of 296,137 for and 285,305 against.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 77, § 4: Jan. 1, 1999.

§ 1. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning Supreme Court Justices, was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 80, § 22(F), effective July 1, 2001.

§ 2. [Circuit, chancery, and probate judges].

Circuit, chancery, and probate judges may temporarily exchange circuits by joint order. Any circuit, chancery, or probate judge who consents may be assigned to another circuit for temporary service under rules prescribed by the Supreme Court.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Cross References.

Revision of Ark. Const., Art. 7, Judicial Department., Ark. Const. Amend. 80.

§ 3. [Repeal of Ark. Const., Art. 7, §§ 9, 21, 22].

Article 7, Section 9, 21, and 22 are hereby repealed.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.